Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 584, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 584. A. Any registration with the Department of
Corrections required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall be
in a form approved by the Department and shall include the following
information about the person registering:
1. The name of the person and all aliases used or under which
the person has been known;
2. A complete description of the person, including a photograph
and fingerprints, and when requested by the Department of
Corrections, such registrant shall submit to a blood or saliva test
Req. No. 15260 Page 1

for purposes of a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) profile. Submission
to testing for individuals registering shall be within thirty (30)
days of registration. Registrants who already have valid samples on
file in the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) DNA
Offender Database shall not be required to submit duplicate samples
for testing;
3. The offenses listed in Section 582 of this title for which
the person has been convicted or the person received a suspended
sentence or any form of probation, where the offense was committed,
where the person was convicted or received the suspended sentence or
any form of probation, and the name under which the person was
convicted or received the suspended sentence or probation;
4. The name and location of each hospital or penal institution
to which the person was committed for each offense listed in Section
582 of this title;
5. Where the person previously resided, where the person
currently resides including a mappable address and a zip ZIP code,
how long the person has resided there, how long the person expects
to reside there, and how long the person expects to remain in the
county and in this state. The address of the residence shall be a
physical address, not a post office box. The Department of
Corrections shall conduct address verification of each registered
sex offender as follows:

Req. No. 15260 Page 2

a. on an annual basis, if the numeric risk level of the
person is one,
b. on a semiannual basis, if the numeric risk level of
the person is two, or
c. every ninety (90) days, if the offender has been
determined to be a habitual or aggravated sex offender
by the Department of Corrections or has been assigned
a level assignment of three.
The Department of Corrections shall mail a nonforwardable
verification form to the last-reported address of the person. The
person shall return the verification form in person to the local law
enforcement authority of that jurisdiction within ten (10) days
after receipt of the form and may be photographed by the local law
enforcement authority at that time; provided that the person shall
be photographed by the local law enforcement authority at that time
if the photograph in the Department of Corrections sex offender
registry is more than one (1) year old, or if it cannot be
determined when the photograph in the registry was taken. The local
law enforcement authority shall require the person to produce proof
of the identity of the person and a current mappable address with a
zip ZIP code. Upon confirming the information contained within the
verification form, the local law enforcement authority shall forward
a copy of the form to the Department of Corrections, in a manner
approved by the Department of Corrections, within three (3) days
Req. No. 15260 Page 3

afte r receipt of the form. The verification form shall be signed by
the person and state the current address of the person. In the
absence of receipt of the mailed verification form by the offender,
the offender must continue to comply with the reporting requirements
as provided in this paragraph. The offender should report as
required to the local law enforcement agency for current address
verification. The Department of Corrections will provide an
alternative address verification form to local law enforcement for
conformity. Failure to return the verification form or report as
required shall be a violation of the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
The Department of Corrections shall notify the office of the
district attorney and local law enforcement authority of the
appropriate county, within forty-five (45) days if unable to verify
the address of a sex offender. A local law enforcement authority
may notify the office of the district attorney whenever it comes to
the attention of the local law enforcement authority that a sex
offender is not in compliance with any provisions of Section 581 et
seq. of this title. A local law enforcement authority designated as
the primary registration authority of the person may, at any time,
mail a nonforwardable verification form to the last-reported address
of the person. The person shall return the verification form in
person to the local law enforcement authority that mailed the form
within ten (10) days after receipt of the form. The local law
enforcement authority shall require the person to produce proof of
Req. No. 15260 Page 4

the identity of the person and a current mappable address with a zip
ZIP code;
6. The name and address of any school where the person expects
to become or is enrolled or employed for any length of time;
7. A description of all occupants residing with the person
registering, including, but not limited to, name, date of birth,
gender, relation to the person registering, and how long the
occupant has resided there;
8. The level assignment of the person; and
9. Any electronic mail address information, instant message,
chat or other Internet communication name or identity information
that the person uses or intends to use while accessing the Internet
or used for other purposes of social networking or other similar
Internet communication.
B. Conviction data and fingerprints shall be promptly
transmitted at the time of registration to the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation (OSBI) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
(FBI) if the state has not previously sent the information at the
time of conviction.
C. Any person subject to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act or the Mary Rippy Violent Crime Offenders
Registration Act, who has an out-of-state conviction that requires
registration, shall provide the local law enforcement authority
where the offender intends to reside with a certified copy of the
Req. No. 15260 Page 5

offe nder's judgment and sentencing report within sixty (60) days of
the offender's initial registration with this state. If an offender
moves to a different location in this state outside of the
jurisdiction of the law enforcement authority that has a certified
copy of the judgment and sentencing report, the offender shall
provide the local law enforcement authority of the new location
where the offender intends to reside with a certified copy of the
judgment and sentencing report within sixty (60) days of
establishing residency in the new location.
On or after November 1, 2011, the Department of Corrections
shall notify by regular first-class mail to the registered addresses
in the sex offender registry all offenders required to register in
this state that have an out-of-state conviction to obtain a
certified copy of the offender's judgment and sentencing report and
file it with the local law enforcement authority in which the
offender resides within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt of
the mailed notice.
D. The registration with the local law enforcement authority
required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall be in a form
approved by the local law enforcement authority and shall include
the following information about the person registering:
1. The full name of the person, alias, date of birth, sex,
race, height, weight, eye color, social security Social Security
number, driver license number, and a mappable home address with a
Req. No. 15260 Page 6

zip ZIP code. The home address shall be a physical address, not a
post office box;
2. A description of the offense for which the offender was
convicted, the date of the conviction, and the sentence imposed, if
applicable;
3. A photocopy of the driver license of the person;
4. The level assignment of the person.
For purposes of this section, "local law enforcement authority"
means:
a. the municipal police department, if the person resides
or intends to reside or stay within the jurisdiction
of any municipality of this state, or
b. the county sheriff, if the person resides or intends
to reside or stay at any place outside the
jurisdiction of any municipality within this state,
and
c. the police or security department of any institution
of higher learning within this state if the person:
(1) enrolls as a full-time or part-time student,
(2) is a full-time or part-time employee at an
institution of higher learning, or
(3) resides or intends to reside or stay on any
property owned or controlled by the institution
of higher learning; and
Req. No. 15260 Page 7

5. Any electronic mail address information, instant message,
chat or other Internet communication name or identity information
that the person uses or intends to use while accessing the Internet
or used for other purposes of social networking or other similar
Internet communication.
E. Any person subject to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act who changes address, employment or student
enrollment status shall appear in person and give notification to
the local law enforcement authority of the change of address and the
new mappable address with zip ZIP code, the change of employment or
the change of student enrollment status no later than three (3)
business days prior to the abandonment of or move from the current
address or, in the case of change of employment or student
enrollment, within three (3) business days of such change. The
address given to the local law enforcement authority shall be a
physical address, not a post office box. If the new address,
employment or student enrollment is under the jurisdiction of a
different local law enforcement authority:
1. The local law enforcement authority shall notify the
Department of Corrections and the new local law enforcement
authority by teletype or electronic transmission of the change of
address, employment or student enrollment status;
2. The offender shall notify the new local law enforcement
authority of any previous registration; and
Req. No. 15260 Page 8

3. The new local law enforcement authority shall notify the
most recent registering agency by teletype or electronic
transmission of the change in address, employment or student
enrollment status of the offender. If the new address is in another
state, the Department of Corrections shall promptly notify the
agency responsible for registration in that state of the new address
of the offender.
F. Any person registered as a sex offender, pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, who has provided a post office box as an
address shall be contacted by local law enforcement and required to
provide a physical address.
G. Any person subject to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act who is unable to provide a mappable address with a
zip ZIP code to the Department of Corrections or local law
enforcement authority as required in subsections A, C and D of this
section and registers as a transient shall report in person to the
nearest local law enforcement authority every seven (7) days and
provide to the local law enforcement authority the approximate
location of where the person is staying and where the person plans
to stay.
H. Any person subject to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act who resides with a minor child must report to the
statewide centralized hotline of the Department of Human Services
the name and date of birth of any and all minor children residing in
Req. No. 15260 Page 9

the same household and the offenses for which the person is required
to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act within
three (3) days of intent to reside with a minor child.
I. The Department of Corrections shall maintain a file of all
sex offender registrations. A copy of the information contained in
the registration shall promptly be available to state, county and
municipal law enforcement agencies, the State Superintendent of
Public Instruction, the State Commissioner of Health, and the
National Sex Offender Registry maintained by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, unless otherwise prohibited by law. The file shall
promptly be made available for public inspection or copying pursuant
to rules prescribed by the Department of Corrections and may be made
available through Internet access, unless otherwise prohibited by
law. The Department of Corrections shall promptly provide all
municipal police departments, all county sheriff departments and all
campus police departments a list of those sex offenders registered
and living in their county.
J. 1. The Department of Corrections shall, upon the request of
any Internet entity, release to such entity any information required
pursuant to paragraph 9 of subsection A of this section or paragraph
5 of subsection D of this section that would enable the Internet
entity to prescreen or remove sex offenders from its services or, in
conformity with state and federal law, advise law enforcement or
other governmental entities of potential violations of law or
Req. No. 15260 Page 10

thre ats to public safety. Before releasing information to an
Internet entity the Department shall require an Internet entity that
requests information to submit to the Department the name, address
and telephone number of such entity and the specific legal nature
and corporate status of such entity. Except for the purposes
specified in this subsection, an Internet entity shall not publish
or in any way disclose or redisclose any information provided to it
by the Department pursuant to this subsection. The Department shall
update any information released pursuant to this subsection on a
monthly basis to ensure that the information of every individual
that has been removed from the sex offender registry in this state
is no longer released pursuant to this subsection. The Department
may charge the Internet entity a fee for access to information
pursuant to this subsection. The Department shall promulgate any
rules necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection. As
used in this subsection "Internet entity" means any business,
organization or other entity providing or offering a service over
the Internet which permits persons under eighteen (18) years of age
to access, meet, congregate or communicate with other users for the
purpose of social networking. This definition shall not include
general e-mail email services.
2. Any person subject to the provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act who is otherwise not prohibited from using a
networking website and who creates a profile or who uses the
Req. No. 15260 Page 11

func tionality of a networking website to contact or attempt to
contact other networking website users, shall include in his or her
profile for the networking website an indication that he or she is a
sex offender and shall include notice of the crime for which the
person was convicted, the jurisdiction of conviction, and
residential address. The person shall ensure that this information
is displayed in his or her profile for the networking website and
that such information is visible to, or is able to be viewed by,
other users and visitors of the networking website.
For purposes of this paragraph, "networking website" means an
Internet website, the purpose of which is social interaction with
other networking website users, which contains profile web pages of
the users of the website that include the names or nicknames of such
users, that allows photographs and any other personal or personally
identifying information to be placed on the profile web pages by
such users, and which provides links to other profile web pages on
the networking website of friends or associates of such users that
can be accessed by other users or visitors to the website. A
networking website also provides users and visitors of the
networking website the ability to leave messages or comments on the
profile web page that are visible to all or some visitors to the
profile web page and may also include a form of electronic mail for
users of the networking website. A networking website shall not
include any of the following:
Req. No. 15260 Page 12

a. an Internet website, the primary purpose of which is
the facilitation of commercial transactions involving
goods or services between its members or visitors,
b. an Internet website, the primary purpose of which is
the dissemination of news, or
c. an Internet website of a governmental entity.
K. The Superintendent of Public Instruction is authorized to
copy and shall distribute information from the sex offender registry
to school districts and individual public and private schools within
the state with a notice using the following or similar language: "A
person whose name appears on this registry has been convicted of a
sex offense. Continuing to employ a person whose name appears on
this registry may result in civil liability for the employer or
criminal prosecution pursuant to Section 589 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes."
L. The State Commissioner of Health is authorized to distribute
information from the sex offender registry to any nursing home or
long-term care facility. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed
to impose any liability upon or give rise to a cause of action
against any person, agency, organization, or company for failing to
release information in accordance with the Sex Offenders
Registration Act.
M. Each local law enforcement authority shall make its sex
offender registry available upon request, without restriction, at a
Req. No. 15260 Page 13

cost that is no more than what is charged for other records provided
by the local law enforcement authority pursuant to the Oklahoma Open
Records Act.
When a local law enforcement authority sends a copy of or
otherwise makes the sex offender registry available to any public or
private school offering any combination of prekindergarten through
twelfth grade classes or child care facility licensed by the state,
the agency shall provide a notice using the following or similar
language: "A person whose name appears on this registry has been
convicted of a sex offense. Continuing to employ a person whose
name appears on this registry may result in civil liability for the
employer or criminal prosecution pursuant to Section 589 of Title 57
of the Oklahoma Statutes."
N. Samples of blood or saliva for DNA testing required by
subsection A of this section shall be taken by employees or
contractors of the Department of Corrections. The individuals shall
be properly trained to collect blood or saliva samples. Persons
collecting samples for DNA testing pursuant to this section shall be
immune from civil liabilities arising from this activity. The
Department of Corrections shall ensure the collection of samples is
mailed to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) within
ten (10) days of the time the subject appears for testing. The
Department shall use sample kits provided by the OSBI and procedures
promulgated by the OSBI. Persons subject to DNA testing pursuant to
Req. No. 15260 Page 14

this section shall be required to pay to the Department of
Corrections a fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00). Any fees collected
pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the Department of
Corrections revolving account.
O. 1. Any person who has been convicted of or received a
suspended sentence or any probationary term, including a deferred
sentence imposed in violation of subsection G of Section 991c of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for any crime listed in Section
582 of this title and:
a. who is subsequently convicted of a crime or an attempt
to commit a crime listed in subsection A of Section
582 of this title, or
b. who enters this state after November 1, 1997, and who
has been convicted of an additional crime or attempted
crime which, if committed or attempted in this state,
would be a crime or an attempt to commit a crime
provided for in subsection A of Section 582 of this
title,
shall be subject to all of the registration requirements of the Sex
Offenders Registration Act and shall be designated by the Department
of Corrections as a habitual sex offender. A habitual sex offender
shall be required to register for the lifetime of the habitual sex
offender.

Req. No. 15260 Page 15

2. On or after November 1, 1999, any person who has been
convicted of a crime or an attempt to commit a crime, received a
suspended sentence or any probationary term, including a deferred
sentence imposed in violation of subsection G of Section 991c of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for a crime provided for in
Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if the offense
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation as these terms are
defined in Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
Section 885, 888, 1111.1, 1114 or 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes shall be subject to all the registration requirements of
the Sex Offenders Registration Act and shall be designated by the
Department of Corrections as an aggravated sex offender. An
aggravated sex offender shall be required to register for the
lifetime of the aggravated sex offender.
3. Upon registration of any person designated as a habitual or
aggravated sex offender, pursuant to this subsection, a local law
enforcement authority shall notify, by any method of communication
it deems appropriate, anyone that the local law enforcement
authority determines appropriate, including, but not limited to:
a. the family of the habitual or aggravated sex offender,
b. any prior victim of the habitual or aggravated sex
offender,
c. residential neighbors and churches, community parks,
schools, convenience stores, businesses and other
Req. No. 15260 Page 16

places that children or other potential victims may
frequent, and
d. a nursing facility, a specialized facility, a
residential care home, a continuum-of-care facility,
an assisted living center, and an adult day care
facility.
4. The notification may include, but is not limited to, the
following information:
a. the name and physical address of the habitual or
aggravated sex offender,
b. a physical description of the habitual or aggravated
sex offender, including, but not limited to, age,
height, weight and eye and hair color,
c. a description of the vehicle that the habitual or
aggravated sex offender is known to drive,
d. any conditions or restrictions upon the probation,
parole or conditional release of the habitual or
aggravated sex offender,
e. a description of the primary and secondary targets of
the habitual or aggravated sex offender,
f. a description of the method of offense of the habitual
or aggravated sex offender,
g. a current photograph of the habitual or aggravated sex
offender,
Req. No. 15260 Page 17

h. the name and telephone number of the probation or
parole officer of the habitual or aggravated sex
offender, and
i. the level assignment of the person.
5. The local law enforcement authority shall make the
notification provided for in this subsection regarding a habitual or
aggravated sex offender available to any person upon request.
P. If the probation and parole officer supervising a person
subject to registration receives information to the effect that the
status of the person has changed in any manner that affects proper
supervision of the person including, but not limited to, a change in
the physical health of the person, address, employment, or
educational status, higher educational status, incarceration, or
terms of release, the supervising officer or administrator shall
notify the appropriate local law enforcement authority or
authorities of that change.
Q. Public officials, public employees, and public agencies are
immune from civil liability for good faith conduct under any
provision of the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
1. Nothing in the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall be
deemed to impose any liability upon or to give rise to a cause of
action against any public official, public employee, or public
agency for releasing information to the public or for failing to

Req. No. 15260 Page 18

rele ase information in accordance with the Sex Offenders
Registration Act.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent law
enforcement officers from notifying members of the public of any
persons that pose a danger under circumstances that are not
enumerated in the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15260 GRS 12/30/25















Req. No. 15260 Page 19